Kentucky statutes. TITLE XV Roads, Waterways, And Aviation
Intrastate Air Commerce

183.530.
Regulation of intrastate air commerce. [Repealed.]

183.540.
Intrastate certificates of convenience and necessity — Charter permits — Hearings. [Repealed.]

183.549.
Charter permit for air transportation of persons for hire on unscheduled basis. [Repealed.]

183.550.
Application for charter permits — Fees. [Repealed.]

183.560.
Hearings on applications — Notice — Appearance. [Repealed.]

183.570.
Determination of application — Issuance of permit — Revocation — Transfer — Limitations — Rehearing. [Repealed.]

183.580.
Rate schedules. [Repealed.]

183.590.
Powers of cabinet — Bond for permit. [Repealed.]

183.600.
Director. [Repealed.]

183.610.
Revocation, suspension or modification of certificates; abandonment of route. [Repealed.]

183.620.
Appeals from actions of cabinet. [Repealed.]